Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Officers

271B.8-400.
Required officers.

A corporation shall have the officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

A duly appointed officer may appoint one (1) or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one (1) of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors’ and shareholders’ meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a corporation.

Every officer of a corporation, by acceptance of election or appointment as an officer, including by service, shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by, in the name of, or on behalf of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 89, effective January 1, 1989; 2012, ch. 81, § 90, effective July 12, 2012.

271B.8-410.
Duties of officers.

Each officer shall have the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 90, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-420.
Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge his duties under that authority:

In good faith;

On an informed basis; and

In a manner he honestly believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

An officer shall be considered to discharge his duties on an informed basis if he makes, with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, inquiry into the business and affairs of the corporation, or into a particular action to be taken or decision to be made.

In discharging his duties an officer shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer honestly believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the officer honestly believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence.

An officer shall not be considered to be acting in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (3) of this section unwarranted.

Any action taken as an officer, or any failure to take any action as an officer, shall not be the basis for monetary damages or injunctive relief unless:

The officer has breached or failed to perform his duties in compliance with this section; and

In the case of an action for monetary damages, the breach or failure to perform constitutes willful misconduct or wanton or reckless disregard for the best interests of the corporation or its shareholders.

A person bringing an action or monetary damages under this section shall have the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence the provisions of subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section, and the burden of proving that the breach or failure to perform was the legal cause of damages suffered by the corporation.

Nothing in this section shall eliminate or limit the liability of any officer for any act or omission occurring prior to January 1, 1989.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 91, effective January 1, 1989; 1988, ch. 224, § 10, effective July 15, 1988.

271B.8-430.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation shall be effective when the notice is delivered, unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date and the corporation accepts the future effective date, its board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board of directors provides that the successor shall not take office until the effective date.

A board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 92, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-440.
Contract rights of officers.

The appointment of an officer shall not itself create contract rights.

An officer’s removal shall not affect the officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation shall not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 93, effective January 1, 1989.